Louisiana, session 2026, SB86.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:81.2(E) and 89.1(F) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§81.2. Molestation of a juvenile or a person with a physical or mental disability
* * *
E. Any person who aids and abets another in the commission of an
offense defined in this Section shall be subject to one-half of the mandatory
minimum sentence provided for by this Section.
* * *
§89.1. Aggravated crime against nature
* * *
F. Any person who aids and abets another in the commission of an act
prohibited by Item (A)(2)(b)(i) of this Section shall be subject to one-half of the
mandatory minimum sentence provided for by this Section.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-338 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 86